Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 4. Enrollment in the State Health Insurance Plan.

Sec. 21.55.300.
Eligibility for state health insurance.

Except as provided in this section, a state resident who is a high risk, a TAA eligible individual, or a federally defined eligible individual is eligible to enroll in a state plan described in AS

21.55.100

.

Except for a federally defined eligible individual or TAA eligible individual, a person may not be covered by the state plan

while covered by another health insurance policy or subscriber contract; or

if the person is eligible to be covered

by a plan subject to the requirements of AS

21.56.110

—

21.56.250

;

under another state or federal law, including veterans’ benefits, Native health care, or Medicaid, but not including Medicare; or

under another health benefit program, including self-insurance plan, health care trust, or welfare trust.

Upon ceasing to be a resident, a person is not eligible to purchase or renew coverage under a state plan, but previously purchased coverage remains in effect for the period covered by payments made while a resident.

Additional eligibility requirements for enrollment in a state plan may be imposed if approved by the director.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 125 SLA 1994; am §§ 64, 65 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 3, 4 ch 102 SLA 2003)

Sec. 21.55.310.
Enrollment by an eligible person.

A person may enroll in a state plan by applying to the plan administrator. The application must include the following:

name, address, age, and length of residency of the applicant;

a designation of the plan desired, including deductible option chosen;

information relevant to whether the person is a high risk or a federally defined eligible individual; and

payment of the first premium.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 8 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 66 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 15 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.320.
Plan administrator’s response.

Within 30 days after receiving the application described in AS

21.55.310

, the plan administrator shall

provide the applicant with either a notice of rejection for failing to comply with the requirements of AS

21.55.300

and

21.55.310

or a notice of acceptance; and

for a TAA eligible individual, send a notice to the director specifying the name, address, social security number, and effective date of coverage.

When a person with a disability that is covered under 42 U.S.C. 1395 — 1395b-10 (Title XVIII of the Social Security Act) is referred by an insurer to a state plan under AS

21.55.310

, the plan administrator shall request that the Department of Health and Social Services provide information to the person about applying for the federal benefits.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 9 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 16 ch 31 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 102 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 5 4SSLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which added subsection (b), see 2016 House Journal 1941—1942.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 19, 2016, added (b)

Sec. 21.55.330.
Effective date of policies.

Except as provided in (b) of this section and AS

21.55.130(c)

, insurance under a state plan is effective immediately upon receipt of the first premium, and is retroactive to the date of the application, if the applicant otherwise complies with the requirements of this chapter.

Insurance under a state plan is effective retroactively to the date that the person’s previous contract or policy terminated if the person

applies for a state plan within 60 days after the previous contract or policy terminated;

is accepted by the plan administrator; and

pays a specified premium for the period of retroactive coverage.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 17 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.340.
Solicitation of eligible persons.

The association, under a plan approved by the director, shall disseminate appropriate information to the residents of the state regarding the existence of the state plans and the means of enrollment. Means of communication may include use of the press, radio, and television, as well as publication in appropriate state offices and publications.

The association shall devise and implement means of maintaining public awareness of the provisions of this chapter regarding the state plans and shall administer this chapter in a manner that facilitates public participation in the state plans.

A person may not sell or market a qualified state plan unless the person is acting within the scope of a license issued in this state.

An insurer or hospital or medical service corporation that rejects or applies underwriting restrictions to an applicant for a subscriber contract, a health insurance policy, or a Medicare supplement plan in the state shall notify the applicant of the existence of the state plans, the requirements for being accepted, and the procedure for applying.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992)